Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 3.2. Emergency Services and Disaster Law.
§ 44-146.19.
Powers and duties of political subdivisions.

Each political subdivision within the Commonwealth shall be within the jurisdiction of and served by the Department of Emergency Management and be responsible for local disaster mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery. Each political subdivision shall maintain in accordance with state disaster preparedness plans and programs an agency of emergency management which, except as otherwise provided under this chapter, has jurisdiction over and services the entire political subdivision.

Each political subdivision shall have a director of emergency management who, after the term of the person presently serving in this capacity has expired and in the absence of an executive order by the Governor, shall be the following:

In the case of a city, the mayor or city manager, who shall appoint a coordinator of emergency management with consent of council;

In the case of a county, a member of the board of supervisors selected by the board or the chief administrative officer for the county, who shall appoint a coordinator of emergency management with the consent of the governing body;

A coordinator of emergency management shall be appointed by the council of any town to ensure integration of its organization into the county emergency management organization;

In the case of the Towns of Chincoteague and West Point and of towns with a population in excess of 5,000 having an emergency management organization separate from that of the county, the mayor or town manager shall appoint a coordinator of emergency services with consent of council;

In Smyth County and in York County, the chief administrative officer for the county shall appoint a director of emergency management, with the consent of the governing body, who shall appoint a coordinator of emergency management with the consent of the governing body.

Whenever the Governor has declared a state of emergency, each political subdivision within the disaster area may, under the supervision and control of the Governor or his designated representative, control, restrict, allocate, or regulate the use, sale, production, and distribution of food, fuel, clothing, and other commodities, materials, goods, services, and resource systems which fall only within the boundaries of that jurisdiction and which do not impact systems affecting adjoining or other political subdivisions, enter into contracts and incur obligations necessary to combat such threatened or actual disaster, protect the health and safety of persons and property, and provide emergency assistance to the victims of such disaster. In exercising the powers vested under this section, under the supervision and control of the Governor, the political subdivision may proceed without regard to time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law (except mandatory constitutional requirements) pertaining to the performance of public work, entering into contracts, incurring of obligations, employment of temporary workers, rental of equipment, purchase of supplies and materials, levying of taxes, and appropriation and expenditure of public funds.

The director of each local organization for emergency management may, in collaboration with (i) other public and private agencies within the Commonwealth or (ii) other states or localities within other states, develop or cause to be developed mutual aid arrangements for reciprocal assistance in case of a disaster too great to be dealt with unassisted. Such arrangements shall be consistent with state plans and programs and it shall be the duty of each local organization for emergency management to render assistance in accordance with the provisions of such mutual aid arrangements. Except where a mutual aid arrangement for reciprocal assistance exists between localities, no locality shall prohibit another locality from providing emergency medical services across local boundaries solely on the basis of financial considerations.

Each local and interjurisdictional agency shall prepare and keep current a local or interjurisdictional emergency operations plan for its area. The plan shall include, but not be limited to, responsibilities of all local agencies and shall establish a chain of command, and a provision that the Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund shall be contacted immediately to deploy assistance in the event of an emergency as defined in the emergency response plan when there are victims as defined in §

19.2-11.01

. The Department of Criminal Justice Services and the Virginia Criminal Injuries Compensation Fund shall be the lead coordinating agencies for those individuals determined to be victims, and the plan shall also contain current contact information for both agencies. Such plan shall also contain provisions to ensure that the plan is applied equitably and that the needs of minority and vulnerable communities are met during emergencies. Every four years, each local and interjurisdictional agency shall conduct a comprehensive review and revision of its emergency operations plan to ensure that the plan remains current, and the revised plan shall be formally adopted by the locality’s governing body. In the case of an interjurisdictional agency, the plan shall be formally adopted by the governing body of each of the localities encompassed by the agency. Each political subdivision having a nuclear power station or other nuclear facility within 10 miles of its boundaries shall, if so directed by the Department of Emergency Management, prepare and keep current an appropriate emergency plan for its area for response to nuclear accidents at such station or facility.

All political subdivisions shall provide (i) an annually updated emergency management assessment and (ii) data related to emergency sheltering capabilities, including emergency shelter locations, evacuation zones, capacity by person, medical needs capacity, current wind rating, standards compliance, backup power, and lead agency for staffing, to the State Coordinator of Emergency Management on or before August 1 of each year.

By July 1, 2005, all localities with a population greater than 50,000 shall establish an alert and warning plan for the dissemination of adequate and timely warning to the public in the event of an emergency or threatened disaster. The governing body of the locality, in consultation with its local emergency management organization, shall amend its local emergency operations plan that may include rules for the operation of its alert and warning system, to include sirens, Emergency Alert System (EAS), NOAA Weather Radios, or other personal notification systems, amateur radio operators, or any combination thereof.

Localities that have established an agency of emergency management shall have authority to require the review of, and suggest amendments to, the emergency plans of nursing homes, assisted living facilities, adult day care centers, and child day care centers that are located within the locality.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1974, c. 4; 1975, c. 11; 1978, c. 495; 1982, c. 5; 1990, cc. 404, 945; 1993, cc. 621, 671, 781; 2000, c. 309; 2003, c. 622; 2004, c. 302; 2005, cc. 6, 205; 2006, c. 138; 2007, cc. 97, 129, 138; 2009, cc. 222, 269; 2012, c. 418; 2018, c. 228; 2020, cc. 94, 1021; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 27; 2022, c. 217.

Cross references.

As to the 1980, 1990, 2000 and 2010 United States Census population figures for counties and cities of the Commonwealth of Virginia, see the Appendix to Title 15.2. As to prohibition of waste discharges or other quality alterations of state water, see §

62.1-44.5

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “Emergency Management” for “Emergency Services” throughout the section; in subsection A, substituted “mitigation, preparedness, response and recovery” for “preparedness and coordination of response” at the end of the first sentence, and substituted “state disaster” for “state emergency” near the beginning of the second sentence; and in subsection B, substituted “emergency management” for “emergency services activities” in subdivisions 1 and 2.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 622 added subsection F.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 302 substituted “10” for “ten” in the third sentence of subsection E and added subsection G.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 6 and 205 are identical, and in subsection D, inserted the clause (i) designation and substituted “(ii) other states or localities within other states, develop” for “within an adjacent state, develop.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 138 substituted “shall” for “may” in the second sentence of subsection A, and in subdivisions B 3 and B 5; in subsection B, deleted “have the authority to” preceding “appoint a coordinator” in subdivisions B 1, B 2, B 4, and B 5.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 97 and 138 are identical, and inserted the present third and fourth sentences in subsection E.

The 2007 amendment by c. 129 added subsection H.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 222 and 269 are identical, and added the language beginning “and a provision that the Department of Criminal Justice Services” at the end of the second sentence in subsection E.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 418 in subsection E, deleted “as well as current contact information for both agencies” at the end of the second sentence and added the third sentence.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 228 rewrote subsection F, which formerly read “All political subdivisions shall provide an annually updated emergency management assessment to the State Coordinator of Emergency Management on or before July 1 of each year.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 94 substituted “Towns of Chincoteague and West Point” for “Town of Chincoteague” in subdivision B 4.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1021, added the last sentence in subsection D.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 27, effective July 1, 2021, added the fourth sentence in subsection E.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 217 substituted “August 1” for “May 1” in subsection F.

Law Review.

For 2007 annual survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 441 (2007).

§ 44-146.20.
Joint action by political subdivisions.

If two or more political subdivisions find that disaster operation plans and programs would be better served by interjurisdictional arrangements in planning for, preventing, or responding to disaster in that area, then direct steps may be taken as necessary, including creation of an interjurisdictional relationship, a joint emergency operations plan, mutual aid, or such other activities as necessary for planning and services. Any political subdivision may provide or receive assistance in the event of a disaster or emergency, pursuant to this chapter, under the provisions of any local mutual aid agreement or by the Statewide Mutual Aid program if agreed to by resolution of the governing body. The action of the governing body may include terms and conditions deemed necessary by the governing body for participation in the program. The governing body may withdraw from participation in the Statewide Mutual Aid program by adoption of a resolution or ordinance upon a finding that participation is no longer in the public interest. The locality shall immediately notify the State Coordinator of Emergency Services of the adoption of a participation or withdrawal resolution.

History.

1973, c. 260; 2000, cc. 309, 437.

Cross references.

As to joint aid agreements by localities, see §

15.2-1300.1

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 deleted “services” following “emergency” and deleted the former second sentence, which read: “A determination of such findings shall be based on the factors related to the difficulty of providing emergency services on an interjurisdictional basis.”

The 2000 amendment by c. 437 deleted “adjoining” preceding “political subdivisions,” deleted “services” following “joint emergency,” deleted the former last sentence which read: “A determination of such findings shall be based on the factors related to the difficulty of providing emergency services on an interjurisdictional basis” and added the last four sentences.

§ 44-146.21.
Declaration of local emergency.

A local emergency may be declared by the local director of emergency management with the consent of the governing body of the political subdivision. In the event the governing body cannot convene due to the disaster or other exigent circumstances, the director, or in his absence, the deputy director, or in the absence of both the director and deputy director, any member of the governing body may declare the existence of a local emergency, subject to confirmation by the governing body at its next regularly scheduled meeting or at a special meeting within 45 days of the declaration, whichever occurs first. The governing body, when in its judgment all emergency actions have been taken, shall take appropriate action to end the declared emergency.

A declaration of a local emergency as defined in § 44-146.16 shall activate the local Emergency Operations Plan and authorize the furnishing of aid and assistance thereunder.

Whenever a local emergency has been declared, the director of emergency management of each political subdivision or any member of the governing body in the absence of the director, if so authorized by the governing body, may control, restrict, allocate or regulate the use, sale, production and distribution of food, fuel, clothing and other commodities, materials, goods, services and resource systems which fall only within the boundaries of that jurisdiction and which do not impact systems affecting adjoining or other political subdivisions, enter into contracts and incur obligations necessary to combat such threatened or actual disaster, protect the health and safety of persons and property and provide emergency assistance to the victims of such disaster, and proceed without regard to time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law (except mandatory constitutional requirements) pertaining to the performance of public work, entering into contracts, incurring of obligations, employment of temporary workers, rental of equipment, purchase of supplies and materials, and other expenditures of public funds, provided such funds in excess of appropriations in the current approved budget, unobligated, are available. Whenever the Governor has declared a state of emergency, each political subdivision affected may, under the supervision and control of the Governor or his designated representative, enter into contracts and incur obligations necessary to combat such threatened or actual disaster beyond the capabilities of local government, protect the health and safety of persons and property and provide emergency assistance to the victims of such disaster. In exercising the powers vested under this section, under the supervision and control of the Governor, the political subdivision may proceed without regard to time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law pertaining to public work, entering into contracts, incurring of obligations, employment of temporary workers, rental of equipment, purchase of supplies and materials, levying of taxes, and appropriation and expenditure of public funds.

No interjurisdictional agency or official thereof may declare a local emergency. However, an interjurisdictional agency of emergency management shall provide aid and services to the affected political subdivision authorizing such assistance in accordance with the agreement as a result of a local or state declaration.

None of the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the Emergency Disaster Relief provided by the American Red Cross or other relief agency solely concerned with the provision of service at no cost to the citizens of the Commonwealth.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1974, c. 4; 1975, c. 11; 1976, c. 594; 1986, c. 24; 1990, c. 945; 1994, c. 75; 2000, c. 309; 2016, c. 555.

Cross references.

As to authoriy of local government to regulate or prohibit making of fires on private property during an emergency, see §

15.2-922.1

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “emergency management” for “emergency services” throughout the section; in subsection (a), in the second sentence, inserted “in his absence, the deputy director, or in the absence of both the director and deputy director” and deleted “in the absence of the director” preceding “may declare the existence”; in subsection (b), substituted “the local Emergency Operations Plan” for “the response and recovery programs of all applicable local and interjurisdictional emergency operations plans”; and in subsection (c1), combined the former first and second sentences by substituting “disaster and proceed” for “disaster. In exercising the powers vested under this section, under the supervision and control of the governing body, such director may” and in the present second sentence, substituted “subdivision affected may” for “subdivision within the disaster area may.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by c. 555 redesignated former subdivisions (a), (b), (c1), (d), and (e) as subsections A, B, C, D, and E respectively; in subsection A, substituted “45” for “fourteen”; and deleted subdivision (c).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Imposition of curfew by executive order. —

City properly imposed a curfew by executive order via its emergency powers because of the express grant of broad police powers to care for the health and safety of persons and property found in the Virginia Code. The simple omission of express authority to set a curfew did not preclude the city from instituting a curfew in times of emergency, and the city was within its authority to make a curfew violation a Class 1 misdemeanor. Commonwealth v. Brown, 106 Va. Cir. 69, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 157 (Fredericksburg Sept. 14, 2020).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Electronic meetings during declared emergency. —

Provisions of §

2.2-3708.2

do not permit public bodies (including local government bodies) to hold meetings solely by electronic communication, except during the period of a declared emergency pursuant to §

44-146.17

, so long as three requirements are satisfied: (a) “the Governor has declared a state of emergency in accordance with §

44-146.17

”; (b) “the catastrophic nature of the declared emergency makes it impracticable or unsafe to assemble a quorum in a single location”; and (c) “the purpose of the meeting is to address the emergency.”
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Richard C. (Rip) Sullivan, Jr., Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 20-011,
(3/20/20).

Section 44-146.21 does not authorize local governing bodies to hold meetings solely by electronic communication during the pendency of the emergency, but §

15.2-1413

provides additional authority for localities to ensure continuity of government during the declared emergency. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Richard C. (Rip) Sullivan, Jr., Member, Virginia House of Delegates, 20-011,
(3/20/20).

§ 44-146.22.
Development of measures to prevent or reduce harmful consequences of disasters; disclosure of information.

In addition to disaster prevention measures included in state, local and interjurisdictional emergency operations plans, the Governor shall consider, on a continuing basis, hazard mitigation or other measures that could be taken to prevent or reduce the harmful consequences of disasters. At his direction, and pursuant to any other authority, state agencies, including, but not limited to, those charged with responsibilities in connection with floodplain management, stream encroachment and flow regulation, weather modification, fire prevention and control, air quality, public works, critical infrastructure protection, land use and land-use planning, and construction standards, shall make studies of disaster prevention. The Governor, from time to time, shall make recommendations to the General Assembly, local governments, and other appropriate public and private entities as may facilitate measures for prevention or reduction of the harmful consequences of disasters.

The Governor or agencies acting on his behalf may receive information, voluntarily submitted from both public and nonpublic entities, related to the protection of the nation’s critical infrastructure sectors and components that are located in Virginia or affect the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of Virginia. Information submitted by any public or nonpublic entity in accordance with the procedures set forth in subdivision 14 of §

2.2-3705.2

shall not be disclosed unless:

It is requested by law-enforcement authorities in furtherance of an official investigation or the prosecution of a criminal act;

The agency holding the record is served with a proper judicial order; or

The agency holding the record has obtained the written consent to release the information from the entity voluntarily submitting it.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1974, c. 4; 1975, c. 11; 2000, c. 309; 2003, c. 848; 2004, c. 690; 2017, c. 778.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “basis, hazard mitigation or other measures that” for “basis, steps that” in the first sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 848 added the designator A, in subsection A, inserted “critical infrastructure protection”, and added subsection B.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 690 substituted “subdivision 4 of §

2.2-3705

.2” for “subdivision A 57 of §

2.2-3705

” in the last sentence of the introductory paragraph in subsection B.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 778 substituted “subdivision 14 of §

2.2-3705.2

” for “subdivision 4 of §

2.2-3705.2

” in subsection B.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

If an emergency has not been declared by the Governor,

most data that is not law-enforcement sensitive may be disseminated, at the discretion of the custodian, to necessary parties. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John W. Marshall, Secretary of Public Safety, 03-078, 2003 Va. AG LEXIS 52 (12/1/03).

Irrespective of a formal declaration of an emergency,

certain law-enforcement data, including most criminal history data, may be disseminated only to criminal justice agencies. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John W. Marshall, Secretary of Public Safety, 03-078, 2003 Va. AG LEXIS 52 (12/1/03).

When an emergency has been declared,

the Governor has broad powers to require state agencies to work in cooperation with the private sector to provide for the safety and security of the Commonwealth; thus, some information and intelligence collected by the Intelligence and Information “Fusion” Center may be shared with the private sector in the event of a formally declared emergency. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John W. Marshall, Secretary of Public Safety, 03-078, 2003 Va. AG LEXIS 52 (12/1/03).

§ 44-146.23.
Immunity from liability.

Neither the Commonwealth, nor any political subdivision thereof, nor federal agencies, nor other public or private agencies, nor, except in cases of willful misconduct, public or private employees, nor representatives of any of them, engaged in any emergency services activities, while complying with or attempting to comply with this chapter or any rule, regulation, or executive order promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall be liable for the death of, or any injury to, persons or damage to property as a result of such activities. The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled under this chapter, or under the Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.), or under any pension law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of Congress. For the purposes of the immunity conferred by this subsection, representatives of public or private employees shall include, but shall not be limited to, volunteers in state and local services who are persons who serve in a Medical Reserve Corps (MRC) unit or on a Community Emergency Response Team (CERT).

Any person owning or controlling real estate or other premises who voluntarily and without compensation grants a license or privilege, or otherwise permits the designation or use of the whole or any part or parts of such real estate or premises for the purpose of sheltering persons, of emergency access or of other uses relating to emergency services shall, together with his successors in interest, if any, not be liable for negligently causing the death of, or injury to any person on or about such real estate or premises or for loss of or damage to the property of any person on or about such real estate or premises during such actual or impending disaster.

If any person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any state, or political subdivision thereof, evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical, or other skills, the person, without compensation other than reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses, may render aid involving that skill in the Commonwealth during a disaster, and such person shall not be liable for negligently causing the death of, or injury to, any person or for the loss of, or damage to, the property of any person resulting from such service.

No person, firm or corporation which gratuitously services or repairs any electronic devices or equipment under the provisions of this section after having been approved for the purposes by the State Coordinator shall be liable for negligently causing the death of, or injury to, any person or for the loss of, or damage to, the property of any person resulting from any defect or imperfection in any such device or equipment so gratuitously serviced or repaired.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, no individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity shall be liable in civil damages as a result of acts taken voluntarily and without compensation in the course of rendering care, assistance, or advice with respect to an incident creating a danger to person, property, or the environment as a result of an actual or threatened discharge of a hazardous substance, or in preventing, cleaning up, treating, or disposing of or attempting to prevent, clean up, treat, or dispose of any such discharge, provided that such acts are taken under the direction of state or local authorities responding to the incident. This section shall not preclude liability for civil damages as a result of gross negligence, recklessness or willful misconduct. The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled under this chapter, or under the Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.), or under any pension law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of Congress. The immunity provided by the provisions of this paragraph shall be in addition to, not in lieu of, any immunities provided by §

8.01-225

.

No individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, fraternal organization, religious organization, charitable organization, or any other legal or commercial entity and any successor, officer, director, representative, or agent thereof, who, without compensation other than reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses, provides services, goods, real or personal property, or facilities:

Pursuant to a Governor-declared emergency or during a formal exercise or training of the State Department of Emergency Management or a responsible county or city emergency management entity; and

At the request and direction of the State Department of Emergency Management or a county or city employee whose responsibilities include emergency management;shall be liable for the death of or injury to any person or for the loss of, or damage to, the property of any person where such death, injury, loss, or damage was proximately caused by the circumstances of the actual emergency or its subsequent conditions, or the circumstances of the formal exercise or training if such formal exercise or training simulates conditions of an actual emergency. This subsection shall not preclude liability for civil damages as a result of gross negligence, recklessness, or willful misconduct. The immunities of this subsection shall not extend to any manufacturer or to any retailer or distributor substantially involved in the manufacture or design of any product or good. The provisions of this subsection shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he would otherwise be entitled under this chapter, or under the Workers’ Compensation Act (§

65.2-100

et seq.), or under any pension law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of Congress. The immunity provided by this subsection shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any immunities provided by §

8.01-225

.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1979, c. 193; 1984, c. 743; 2005, c. 474; 2008, cc. 121, 157; 2009, c. 233.

Cross references.

As to immunity for health care providers during disasters, see §

8.01-225.01

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 474 added the last sentence to subsection A; substituted “the Commonwealth” for “this Commonwealth” in subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 121 and 157 are identical, and in subsection C, inserted “without compensation other than reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses,”
deleted “gratuitously” preceding “render aid” and deleted “gratuitous” preceding “service” at the end of the subsection.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 233 added subsection F.

Law Review.

For comment, “ ‘911’ Emergency Assistance Call Systems: Should Local Governments Be Liable for Negligent Failure to Respond?,” see 8 G.M.U. L. Rev. 103 (1985).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

A court may modify the sentence of a defendant

completing the Department of Corrections’ Therapeutic Community Program only if such modification occurs within twenty-one days of entry of the sentencing order. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Henry A. Vanover, Judge, Twenty-Ninth Judicial Circuit, 03-081, 2003 Va. AG LEXIS 43 (10/6/03).

In the absence of a formally declared emergency and without specific legislation,

the general test of whether sovereign immunity applies depends upon the capacity in which the private entity was acting and whether such acts are under the direction and control of the Commonwealth, based on the nature of, and the state’s interest in, the function to be performed. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable John W. Marshall, Secretary of Public Safety, 03-078, 2003 Va. AG LEXIS 52 (12/1/03).

§ 44-146.24.
Cooperation of public agencies.

In carrying out the provisions of the chapter, the Governor, the heads of state agencies, the local directors and governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the Commonwealth are directed to utilize the services, equipment, supplies and facilities of existing departments, offices, and agencies of the Commonwealth and the political subdivisions thereof to the maximum extent practicable consistent with state and local emergency operation plans. The officers and personnel of all such departments, offices, and agencies are directed to cooperate with and extend such services and facilities to the Governor and to the State Department of Emergency Management upon request.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1974, c. 4; 1975, c. 11; 2000, c. 309.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 added “consistent with state and local emergency operation plans” at the end of the first sentence and substituted “Emergency Management” for “Emergency Services” near the end of the second sentence.

§ 44-146.25.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 221, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former § 44-146.25, Certain persons not to be employed or associated in emergency services organizations; loyalty oath required, derived from 1973, c. 260.

§ 44-146.26.
Duties of emergency management organizations.

It shall be the duty of every organization for emergency management established pursuant to this chapter and of the officers thereof to execute and enforce such orders, rules and regulations as may be made by the Governor under authority of this chapter. Each organization shall have available for inspection at its office all such orders, rules and regulations.

History.

1973, c. 260; 2000, c. 309.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “management” for “services” in the section catchline, and substituted “emergency management” for “emergency services” near the beginning of the first sentence.

§ 44-146.27.
Supplementing federal funds; assistance of federal agencies; acceptance of gifts and services; appropriations by local governing bodies.

If the federal government allots funds for the payment of a portion of any disaster programs, projects, equipment, supplies or materials or other related costs, the remaining portion may be paid with a combination of state and local funds available for this purpose and consistent with state emergency management plans and program priorities.

Whenever the federal government or any agency or officer thereof offers to the Commonwealth, or through the Commonwealth to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant or loan for purposes of emergency services, the Commonwealth, acting through the Governor, or such political subdivision, acting with the consent of the Governor and through its local director or governing body, may accept such offer and agree to the terms of the offer and the rules and regulations, if any, of the agency making the offer, including, but not limited to, requirements to hold and save the United States free from damages and to indemnify the federal government against any claims arising from the services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds provided. Upon such acceptance, the Governor or local director or governing body of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the Commonwealth or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the Commonwealth or such political subdivision, in accordance with the terms of the agreement, and subject to the rules and regulations, if any, of the agency making the offer.

Whenever any person, firm or corporation offers to the Commonwealth or to any political subdivision thereof services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant or loan, for purposes of emergency management, the Commonwealth, acting through the Governor, or such political subdivision, acting through its local director or governing body, may accept such offer and upon such acceptance the Governor or local director or governing body of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the Commonwealth or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the Commonwealth or such political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer.

The governing bodies of the counties, cities and towns are hereby authorized to appropriate funds for expenditure by any local or regional organization for emergency management established pursuant to this chapter and for local or regional disaster service activities.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1999, cc. 6, 7; 2000, c. 309.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 119 and 124, effective February 12, 1999, are identical, and redesignated subsections (a) through (d) as subsections A through D; substituted “allots” for “shall allot” in subsection A; in subsection B, substituted “offers” for “shall offer,” inserted the language beginning “agree to the terms” at the end of the first sentence, and substituted “in accordance with the terms of the agreement, and subject to” for “and subject to the terms of the offer and”; and substituted “offers” for “shall offer” in subsection C.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “emergency management” for “emergency service” in subsections A and D; and substituted “emergency management” for “emergency services” in subsection C.